District of Columbia statutes.
29-1206.09

Direct action by beneficial owner.

A beneficial owner may maintain a direct action against a statutory trust to redress an injury sustained by, or to enforce a duty owed to, the beneficial owner only if the owner can plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the statutory trust.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(7)(F), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-1201.04.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 609 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.